Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLI Laws
CHAPTER 446 Construction of Statutes

446.010.
Definitions for statutes generally. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

As used in the statute laws of this state, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Action” includes all proceedings in any court of this state;

“Animal” includes every warm-blooded living creature except a human being;

“Attorney” means attorney-at-law;

“Bequeath” and “devise” mean the same thing;

“Bequest” and “legacy” mean the same thing, and embrace either real or personal estate, or both;

“Business trust” includes, except when utilized in KRS Chapter 386, a “statutory trust” as organized under KRS Chapter 386A;

“Case plan” means an individualized accountability and behavior change strategy for supervised individuals that:

Targets and prioritizes the specific criminal risk factors of the individual based upon his or her assessment results;

Matches the type and intensity of supervision and treatment conditions to the individual’s level of risk, criminal risk factors, and individual characteristics, such as gender, culture, motivational stage, developmental stage, and learning style;

Establishes a timetable for achieving specific behavioral goals, including a schedule for payment of victim restitution, child support, and other financial obligations; and

Specifies positive and negative actions that will be taken in response to the supervised individual’s behaviors;

“Certified mail” means any method of governmental, commercial, or electronic delivery that allows a document or package to have proof of:

Sending the document or package;

The date the document or package was delivered or delivery was attempted; and

The signature of the receipt of the document or package;

“Company” may extend and be applied to any corporation, company, person, partnership, joint stock company, or association;

“Corporation” may extend and be applied to any corporation, company, partnership, joint stock company, or association;

“Criminal risk factors” are characteristics and behaviors that, when addressed or changed, affect a person’s risk for committing crimes. The characteristics may include but are not limited to the following risk and criminogenic need factors: antisocial behavior; antisocial personality; criminal thinking; criminal associates; dysfunctional family; low levels of employment or education; poor use of leisure and recreation; and substance abuse;

“Cruelty” as applied to animals includes every act or omission whereby unjustifiable physical pain, suffering, or death is caused or permitted;

“Directors,” when applied to corporations, includes managers or trustees;

“Domestic,” when applied to a corporation, partnership, business trust, or limited liability company, means all those incorporated or formed by authority of this state;

“Domestic animal” means any animal converted to domestic habitat;

“Evidence-based practices” means policies, procedures, programs, and practices proven by scientific research to reliably produce reductions in recidivism when implemented competently;

“Federal” refers to the United States;

“Foreign,” when applied to a corporation, partnership, limited partnership, business trust, statutory trust, or limited liability company, includes all those incorporated or formed by authority of any other state;

“Generally accepted accounting principles” are those uniform minimum standards of and guidelines to financial accounting and reporting as adopted by the National Council on Governmental Accounting, under the auspices of the Municipal Finance Officers Association and by the Financial Accounting Standards Board, under the auspices of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants;

“Graduated sanction” means any of a wide range of accountability measures and programs for supervised individuals, including but not limited to electronic monitoring; drug and alcohol testing or monitoring; day or evening reporting centers; restitution centers; reentry centers; disallowance of future earned compliance credits; rehabilitative interventions such as substance abuse or mental health treatment; reporting requirements to probation and parole officers; community service or work crews; secure or unsecure residential treatment facilities or halfway houses; and short-term or intermittent incarceration;

“Humane society,” “society,” or “Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals,” means any nonprofit corporation, organized under the laws of this state and having as its primary purpose the prevention of cruelty to animals;

“Issue,” as applied to the descent of real estate, includes all the lawful lineal descendants of the ancestors;

“Land” or “real estate” includes lands, tenements, and hereditaments and all rights thereto and interest therein, other than a chattel interest;

“Legatee” and “devisee” convey the same idea;

“Livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, or any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species;

“May” is permissive;

“Month” means calendar month;

“Oath” includes “affirmation” in all cases in which an affirmation may be substituted for an oath;

“Owner” when applied to any animal, means any person having a property interest in such animal;

“Partnership” includes both general and limited partnerships;

“Peace officer” includes sheriffs, constables, coroners, jailers, metropolitan and urban-county government correctional officers, marshals, policemen, and other persons with similar authority to make arrests;

“Penitentiary” includes all of the state penal institutions except the houses of reform;

“Person” may extend and be applied to bodies-politic and corporate, societies, communities, the public generally, individuals, partnerships, joint stock companies, and limited liability companies;

“Personal estate” includes chattels, real and other estate that passes to the personal representative upon the owner dying intestate;

“Pretrial risk assessment” means an objective, research-based, validated assessment tool that measures a defendant’s risk of flight and risk of anticipated criminal conduct while on pretrial release pending adjudication;

“Registered mail” means any governmental, commercial, or electronic method of delivery that allows a document or package to have:

Its chain of custody recorded in a register to enable its location to be tracked;

Insurance available to cover its loss; and

The signature of the recipient of the document or package available to the sender;

“Regular election” means the election in even-numbered years at which members of Congress are elected and the election in odd-numbered years at which state officers are elected;

“Risk and needs assessment” or “validated risk and needs assessment” means an actuarial tool scientifically proven to determine a person’s risk to reoffend and criminal risk factors, that when properly addressed, can reduce that person’s likelihood of committing future criminal behavior;

“Shall” is mandatory;

“State” when applied to a part of the United States, includes territories, outlying possessions, and the District of Columbia; “any other state” includes any state, territory, outlying possession, the District of Columbia, and any foreign government or country;

“State funds” or “public funds” means sums actually received in cash or negotiable instruments from all sources unless otherwise described by any state agency, state-owned corporation, university, department, cabinet, fiduciary for the benefit of any form of state organization, authority, board, bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, office, or any other form of organization whether or not the money has ever been paid into the Treasury and whether or not the money is still in the Treasury if the money is controlled by any form of state organization, except for those funds the management of which is to be reported to the Legislative Research Commission pursuant to KRS

42.600

,

42.605

, and

42.615

;

“Supervised individual” means an individual placed on probation by a court or serving a period of parole or post-release supervision from prison or jail;

“Sworn” includes “affirmed” in all cases in which an affirmation may be substituted for an oath;

“Treatment” when used in a criminal justice context, means targeted interventions that focus on criminal risk factors in order to reduce the likelihood of criminal behavior. Treatment options may include but shall not be limited to community-based programs that are consistent with evidence-based practices; cognitive-behavioral programs; faith-based programs; inpatient and outpatient substance abuse or mental health programs; and other available prevention and intervention programs that have been scientifically proven to produce reductions in recidivism when implemented competently. “Treatment” does not include medical services;

“United States” includes territories, outlying possessions, and the District of Columbia;

“Vacancy in office,” or any equivalent phrase, means such as exists when there is an unexpired part of a term of office without a lawful incumbent therein, or when the person elected or appointed to an office fails to qualify according to law, or when there has been no election to fill the office at the time appointed by law; it applies whether the vacancy is occasioned by death, resignation, removal from the state, county or district, or otherwise;

“Violate” includes failure to comply with;

“Will” includes codicils; “last will” means last will and testament;

“Year” means calendar year;

“City” includes town;

Appropriation-related terms are defined as follows:

“Appropriation” means an authorization by the General Assembly to expend, from public funds, a sum of money not in excess of the sum specified, for the purposes specified in the authorization and under the procedure prescribed in KRS Chapter 48;

“Appropriation provision” means a section of any enactment by the General Assembly which is not provided for by KRS Chapter 48 and which authorizes the expenditure of public funds other than by a general appropriation bill;

“General appropriation bill” means an enactment by the General Assembly that authorizes the expenditure of public funds in a branch budget bill as provided for in KRS Chapter 48;

“Mediation” means a nonadversarial process in which a neutral third party encourages and helps disputing parties reach a mutually acceptable agreement. Recommendations by mediators are not binding on the parties unless the parties enter into a settlement agreement incorporating the recommendations;

“Biennium” means the two (2) year period commencing on July 1 in each even-numbered year and ending on June 30 in the ensuing even-numbered year;

“Branch budget bill” or “branch budget” means an enactment by the General Assembly which provides appropriations and establishes fiscal policies and conditions for the biennial financial plan for the judicial branch, the legislative branch, and the executive branch, which shall include a separate budget bill for the Transportation Cabinet;

“AVIS” means the automated vehicle information system established and maintained by the Transportation Cabinet to collect titling and registration information on vehicles and boats and information on holders of motor vehicle operator’s licenses and personal identification cards;

“Cooperative,” except in KRS Chapter 272, includes a limited cooperative association; and

“Unmanned aircraft system” means an aircraft that is operated without the possibility of direct human interaction from within or on the aircraft and includes everything that is on board or otherwise attached to the aircraft and all associated elements, including communication links and the components that control the small unmanned aircraft that are required for the safe and efficient operation of the unmanned aircraft in the national airspace system.

History.

446, 451, 452, 456, 457, 458, 463, 467, 469, 575, 751, 1521: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 277; 1974, ch. 406, § 331; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 462, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 16, § 2; 1980, ch. 188, § 181, effective July 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 382, § 30, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 2, § 1, effective January 26, 1984; 1990, ch. 138, § 3, effective January 3, 1994; 1994, ch. 387, § 31, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 389, § 110, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 261, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 140, § 3, effective June 21, 2001; 2006, ch. 149, § 237, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 78, § 42, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 61, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 151, § 120, effective January 1, 2011; 2011, ch. 2, § 3, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 81, § 126, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 139, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 160, § 139, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 129, § 30, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 158, § 94, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 26, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/30/90). The definition of
“animal” contained in subsection (2) of this section does not
reflect the amendatory language contained in Senate Bill 263 of the 1980 Regular
Session of the Kentucky General Assembly because the 1980 Senate Journal indicates
that Senate Bill 263 was vetoed by Governor John Y. Brown, Jr., on April 9,
1980, and recommitted by action of the Senate to its Committee on Appropriations
and Revenue on April 14, 1980. Senate Bill 263 proposed to change subsection
(2) to read as follows: “‘Animal’ includes every warmblooded
living creature except birds and human beings;”. By a letter dated March
16, 1990, the Attorney General has informally opined that Governor Brown’s
veto of Senate Bill 263 was not timely; that letter has exhibits showing that
the bill was received by the Governor on March 28, 1980, and that his veto
was received by the Senate Clerk on April 10, 1980.

446.010.
Definitions for statutes generally. [Effective January 1, 2023]

As used in the statute laws of this state, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Action” includes all proceedings in any court of this state;

“Animal” includes every warm-blooded living creature except a human being;

“Attorney” means attorney-at-law;

“Bequeath” and “devise” mean the same thing;

“Bequest” and “legacy” mean the same thing, and embrace either real or personal estate, or both;

“Business trust” includes, except when utilized in KRS Chapter 386, a “statutory trust” as organized under KRS Chapter 386A;

“Case plan” means an individualized accountability and behavior change strategy for supervised individuals that:

Targets and prioritizes the specific criminal risk factors of the individual based upon his or her assessment results;

Matches the type and intensity of supervision and treatment conditions to the individual’s level of risk, criminal risk factors, and individual characteristics, such as gender, culture, motivational stage, developmental stage, and learning style;

Establishes a timetable for achieving specific behavioral goals, including a schedule for payment of victim restitution, child support, and other financial obligations; and

Specifies positive and negative actions that will be taken in response to the supervised individual’s behaviors;

“Certified mail” means any method of governmental, commercial, or electronic delivery that allows a document or package to have proof of:

Sending the document or package;

The date the document or package was delivered or delivery was attempted; and

The signature of the receipt of the document or package;

“Company” may extend and be applied to any corporation, company, person, partnership, joint stock company, or association;

“Corporation” may extend and be applied to any corporation, company, partnership, joint stock company, or association;

“Criminal risk factors” are characteristics and behaviors that, when addressed or changed, affect a person’s risk for committing crimes. The characteristics may include but are not limited to the following risk and criminogenic need factors: antisocial behavior; antisocial personality; criminal thinking; criminal associates; dysfunctional family; low levels of employment or education; poor use of leisure and recreation; and substance abuse;

“Cruelty” as applied to animals includes every act or omission whereby unjustifiable physical pain, suffering, or death is caused or permitted;

“Directors,” when applied to corporations, includes managers or trustees;

“Domestic,” when applied to a corporation, partnership, business trust, or limited liability company, means all those incorporated or formed by authority of this state;

“Domestic animal” means any animal converted to domestic habitat;

“Evidence-based practices” means policies, procedures, programs, and practices proven by scientific research to reliably produce reductions in recidivism when implemented competently;

“Federal” refers to the United States;

“Foreign,” when applied to a corporation, partnership, limited partnership, business trust, statutory trust, or limited liability company, includes all those incorporated or formed by authority of any other state;

“Generally accepted accounting principles” are those uniform minimum standards of and guidelines to financial accounting and reporting as adopted by the National Council on Governmental Accounting, under the auspices of the Municipal Finance Officers Association and by the Financial Accounting Standards Board, under the auspices of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants;

“Graduated sanction” means any of a wide range of accountability measures and programs for supervised individuals, including but not limited to electronic monitoring; drug and alcohol testing or monitoring; day or evening reporting centers; restitution centers; reentry centers; disallowance of future earned compliance credits; rehabilitative interventions such as substance abuse or mental health treatment; reporting requirements to probation and parole officers; community service or work crews; secure or unsecure residential treatment facilities or halfway houses; and short-term or intermittent incarceration;

“Humane society,” “society,” or “Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals,” means any nonprofit corporation, organized under the laws of this state and having as its primary purpose the prevention of cruelty to animals;

“Issue,” as applied to the descent of real estate, includes all the lawful lineal descendants of the ancestors;

“Land” or “real estate” includes lands, tenements, and hereditaments and all rights thereto and interest therein, other than a chattel interest;

“Legatee” and “devisee” convey the same idea;

“Livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, or any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species;

“May” is permissive;

“Month” means calendar month;

“Oath” includes “affirmation” in all cases in which an affirmation may be substituted for an oath;

“Owner” when applied to any animal, means any person having a property interest in such animal;

“Partnership” includes both general and limited partnerships;

“Peace officer” includes sheriffs, constables granted police powers, coroners, jailers, metropolitan and urban-county government correctional officers, marshals, policemen, and other persons with similar authority to make arrests;

“Penitentiary” includes all of the state penal institutions except the houses of reform;

“Person” may extend and be applied to bodies-politic and corporate, societies, communities, the public generally, individuals, partnerships, joint stock companies, and limited liability companies;

“Personal estate” includes chattels, real and other estate that passes to the personal representative upon the owner dying intestate;

“Pretrial risk assessment” means an objective, research-based, validated assessment tool that measures a defendant’s risk of flight and risk of anticipated criminal conduct while on pretrial release pending adjudication;

“Registered mail” means any governmental, commercial, or electronic method of delivery that allows a document or package to have:

Its chain of custody recorded in a register to enable its location to be tracked;

Insurance available to cover its loss; and

The signature of the recipient of the document or package available to the sender;

“Regular election” means the election in even-numbered years at which members of Congress are elected and the election in odd-numbered years at which state officers are elected;

“Risk and needs assessment” or “validated risk and needs assessment” means an actuarial tool scientifically proven to determine a person’s risk to reoffend and criminal risk factors, that when properly addressed, can reduce that person’s likelihood of committing future criminal behavior;

“Shall” is mandatory;

“State” when applied to a part of the United States, includes territories, outlying possessions, and the District of Columbia; “any other state” includes any state, territory, outlying possession, the District of Columbia, and any foreign government or country;

“State funds” or “public funds” means sums actually received in cash or negotiable instruments from all sources unless otherwise described by any state agency, state-owned corporation, university, department, cabinet, fiduciary for the benefit of any form of state organization, authority, board, bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, office, or any other form of organization whether or not the money has ever been paid into the Treasury and whether or not the money is still in the Treasury if the money is controlled by any form of state organization, except for those funds the management of which is to be reported to the Legislative Research Commission pursuant to KRS

42.600

,

42.605

, and

42.615

;

“Supervised individual” means an individual placed on probation by a court or serving a period of parole or post-release supervision from prison or jail;

“Sworn” includes “affirmed” in all cases in which an affirmation may be substituted for an oath;

“Treatment” when used in a criminal justice context, means targeted interventions that focus on criminal risk factors in order to reduce the likelihood of criminal behavior. Treatment options may include but shall not be limited to community-based programs that are consistent with evidence-based practices; cognitive-behavioral programs; faith-based programs; inpatient and outpatient substance abuse or mental health programs; and other available prevention and intervention programs that have been scientifically proven to produce reductions in recidivism when implemented competently. “Treatment” does not include medical services;

“United States” includes territories, outlying possessions, and the District of Columbia;

“Vacancy in office,” or any equivalent phrase, means such as exists when there is an unexpired part of a term of office without a lawful incumbent therein, or when the person elected or appointed to an office fails to qualify according to law, or when there has been no election to fill the office at the time appointed by law; it applies whether the vacancy is occasioned by death, resignation, removal from the state, county or district, or otherwise;

“Violate” includes failure to comply with;

“Will” includes codicils; “last will” means last will and testament;

“Year” means calendar year;

“City” includes town;

Appropriation-related terms are defined as follows:

“Appropriation” means an authorization by the General Assembly to expend, from public funds, a sum of money not in excess of the sum specified, for the purposes specified in the authorization and under the procedure prescribed in KRS Chapter 48;

“Appropriation provision” means a section of any enactment by the General Assembly which is not provided for by KRS Chapter 48 and which authorizes the expenditure of public funds other than by a general appropriation bill;

“General appropriation bill” means an enactment by the General Assembly that authorizes the expenditure of public funds in a branch budget bill as provided for in KRS Chapter 48;

“Mediation” means a nonadversarial process in which a neutral third party encourages and helps disputing parties reach a mutually acceptable agreement. Recommendations by mediators are not binding on the parties unless the parties enter into a settlement agreement incorporating the recommendations;

“Biennium” means the two (2) year period commencing on July 1 in each even- numbered year and ending on June 30 in the ensuing even-numbered year;

“Branch budget bill” or “branch budget” means an enactment by the General Assembly which provides appropriations and establishes fiscal policies and conditions for the biennial financial plan for the judicial branch, the legislative branch, and the executive branch, which shall include a separate budget bill for the Transportation Cabinet;

“AVIS” means the automated vehicle information system established and maintained by the Transportation Cabinet to collect titling and registration information on vehicles and boats and information on holders of motor vehicle operator’s licenses and personal identification cards;

“Cooperative,” except in KRS Chapter 272, includes a limited cooperative association; and

“Unmanned aircraft system” means an aircraft that is operated without the possibility of direct human interaction from within or on the aircraft and includes everything that is on board or otherwise attached to the aircraft and all associated elements, including communication links and the components that control the small unmanned aircraft that are required for the safe and efficient operation of the unmanned aircraft in the national airspace system.

HISTORY:

446, 451, 452, 456, 457, 458, 463, 467, 469, 575, 751, 1521: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 277; 1974, ch. 406, § 331; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 462, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 16, § 2; 1980, ch. 188, § 181, effective July 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 382, § 30, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 2, § 1, effective January 26, 1984; 1990, ch. 138, § 3, effective January 3, 1994; 1994, ch. 387, § 31, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 389, § 110, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 261, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 140, § 3, effective June 21, 2001; 2006, ch. 149, § 237, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 78, § 42, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 61, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 151, § 120, effective January 1, 2011; 2011, ch. 2, § 3, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 81, § 126, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 139, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 160, § 139, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 129, § 30, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 158, § 94, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 26, § 4, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 90, § 25, effective January 1, 2023.

446.012.
Inclusion
of osteopaths within references to physicians in statutes — Inclusion
of Bureau of Osteopathic Specialties within references to American Board of
Medical Specialties in statutes.

Any reference in the Kentucky Revised Statutes to “medical doctor,” “M.D.,” or “physician” shall be deemed to include a doctor of osteopathy or D.O., unless any of those terms is specifically excluded.

Any reference in the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the American Board of Medical Specialties shall include the Bureau of Osteopathic Specialties, unless either of those terms is specifically excluded.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 413, § 5, effective July 14, 2000.

446.013.
Terms “mental retardation” and “mentally retarded” not to be used in
statutes — Acceptable replacement terms.

Except as provided in this section, the Kentucky Revised Statutes shall no longer utilize the terms “mental retardation” or “mentally retarded” or abbreviations that use the letters “MR” to signify mental retardation or mentally retarded.

The terms “retarded” or “retardation” shall not be utilized in the Kentucky Revised Statutes to refer to an intellectual disability.

Except as provided in subsections (4), (5), and (6) of this section, the terms “mental retardation” or “mentally retarded” shall be replaced in the Kentucky Revised Statutes, as appropriate, by the terms:

“Intellectual disability”;

“Intellectual disabilities”;

“Individual with an intellectual disability”;

“Individuals with an intellectual disability”;

“Individual with a serious intellectual disability”; or

“Individuals with a serious intellectual disability.”

These terms, when substituted for “mental retardation,” “mentally retarded,” or “MR” shall be understood to have the exact meaning as the terms that they replace.

The names of state and local governmental agencies shall no longer contain the terms “mental retardation,” “mentally retarded,” “retardation,” “retarded,” or abbreviations that use the letters “MR” to signify mental retardation or mentally retarded, and shall be changed to describe the function of that agency without use of these terms.

A nongovernmental entity named or seeking to be named in the Kentucky Revised Statutes that utilizes “mental retardation,” “mentally retarded,” “retarded,” “retardation,” or the letters “MR” to signify mental retardation or mentally retarded in the name it seeks to include in statute, shall be encouraged to modify its name so that these terms are not utilized in statute.

To the extent permitted by federal law, ICF/MRs shall now be referred to as ICF/IDs.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 146, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

446.015.
Statutes
to be written in nontechnical language.

All bills introduced in the
General Assembly after June 17, 1978, shall be written in nontechnical language
and in a clear and coherent manner using words with common and everyday meanings.
Enactment of a bill by the General Assembly shall be a conclusive presumption
that such bill conforms to this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 241, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

446.017.
Conditions
under which portion of bill may be void.

When a bill enrolled, either
approved by the Governor or which became law without the Governor’s signature
under the provisions of Constitution Section 88, and which has been filed
with the Secretary of State, contains language which is not identical to that
contained in the bill passed by the legislature, and when the variance is
material, that language not conforming to the bill as passed shall be severed
and shall be void.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 311, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

446.020.
Singular
includes plural — Masculine includes feminine.

A word importing the singular number only may extend and be applied to several persons or things, as well as to one (1) person or thing, and a word importing the plural number only may extend and be applied to one (1) person or thing as well as to several persons or things.

A word importing the masculine gender only may extend and be applied to females as well as males.

History.

457.

446.030.
Computation
of time.

In computing any period of time prescribed or allowed by order of court, or by any applicable statute or regulation, the day of the act, event or default after which the designated period of time begins to run is not to be included. The last day of the period so computed is to be included, unless it is a Saturday, a Sunday, a legal holiday, or a day on which the public office in which a document is required to be filed is actually and legally closed, in which event the period runs until the end of the next day which is not one (1) of the days just mentioned. When the period of time prescribed or allowed is less than seven (7) days, intermediate Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays shall be excluded in the computation.

When a statute, regulation, or order of court requires an act to be done either a certain time before an event or a certain time before the day on which an event occurs, the day of the event shall be excluded in computing the time. If the day thereby computed on which or by which the act is required to be done falls on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or a day on which the public office in which the act is required to be completed is actually and legally closed, the act may be done on the next day which is none of the days just mentioned.

If any proceeding is directed by law to take place, or any act is directed to be done, on a particular day of a month and that day is Sunday, the proceeding shall take place, or the act shall be done, on the next day that is not a legal holiday.

History.

453, 454: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 98, § 1; 1984, ch. 32, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

446.040.
Adjournment
of proceedings over weekend.

If the law authorizes a court,
or the proceedings of any tribunal or officer, to be adjourned from day to
day, an adjournment from Saturday until Monday shall be legal.

History.

455.

446.050.
Majority
may act for all.

Words giving authority to three
(3) or more public officers or other persons shall be construed as giving
such authority to a majority of such officers or other persons.

History.

448.

446.060.
Writings
— Signature must be at end — To be in English.

When the law requires any writing to be signed by a party thereto, it shall not be deemed to be signed unless the signature is subscribed at the end or close of the writing.

Every writing contemplated by the laws of this state shall be in the English language.

History.

468.

446.070.
Penalty
no bar to civil recovery.

A person injured by the violation
of any statute may recover from the offender such damages as he sustained
by reason of the violation, although a penalty or forfeiture is imposed for
such violation.

History.

466.

446.080.
Liberal construction — Statutes not retroactive — Common usage — Technical terms.

All statutes of this state shall be liberally construed with a view to promote their objects and carry out the intent of the legislature, and the rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall not apply to the statutes of this state.

There shall be no difference in the construction of civil, penal and criminal statutes.

No statute shall be construed to be retroactive, unless expressly so declared.

All words and phrases shall be construed according to the common and approved usage of language, but technical words and phrases, and such others as may have acquired a peculiar and appropriate meaning in the law, shall be construed according to such meaning.

History.

459, 460.

446.082.
Published statement or restatement of law does not constitute law or policy of Commonwealth — Common law adopted in absence of constitutional or statutory treatment.

A statement or restatement of the law in any legal treatise, scholarly publication, textbook, or other explanatory text shall not constitute the law or public policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. No Kentucky court shall treat any such publication or text as controlling authority.

In the absence of a constitutional section or a statute on a given matter, Kentucky shall be deemed to have adopted the common law.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 86, § 1, effective April 14, 2020.

446.085.
Repeal
or amendment in statutes by budget bill prohibited — Exception. [Repealed.]

446.090.
Severability.

It shall be considered that
it is the intent of the General Assembly, in enacting any statute, that if
any part of the statute be held unconstitutional the remaining parts shall
remain in force, unless the statute provides otherwise, or unless the remaining
parts are so essentially and inseparably connected with and dependent upon
the unconstitutional part that it is apparent that the General Assembly would
not have enacted the remaining parts without the unconstitutional part, or
unless the remaining parts, standing alone, are incomplete and incapable of
being executed in accordance with the intent of the General Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 208, § 1, effective October 1, 1942.

446.100.
Effect
of repeal of prior repealer or amendment.

A repealed section without a delayed effective date is revived when the section or act that repealed it is repealed by another statute enacted at the same session of the General Assembly.

A repealed section with a delayed effective date is revived by the enactment of a repealer of the section or act that repealed it at the same or any subsequent session of the General Assembly as long as it takes effect prior to the effective date of the original repealer.

An amended section without a delayed effective date remains unchanged with respect to an amendment which is repealed at the same session of the General Assembly which enacted the amendment.

An amended section with a delayed effective date remains unchanged with respect to that amendment if the section or the act making the amendment is repealed at the same or at a subsequent session of the General Assembly as long as the repealing act takes effect prior to the effective date of the original amendment.

No other action of the General Assembly repealing a repealer or an amendment shall have the effect of reviving the original language of the repealer or amendment as the case may be.

History.

464: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 285, § 1, effective April 2, 1982.

446.110.
Offenses
committed and rights accruing prior to repeal of law.

No new law shall be construed
to repeal a former law as to any offense committed against a former law, nor
as to any act done, or penalty, forfeiture or punishment incurred, or any
right accrued or claim arising under the former law, or in any way whatever
to affect any such offense or act so committed or done, or any penalty, forfeiture
or punishment so incurred, or any right accrued or claim arising before the
new law takes effect, except that the proceedings thereafter had shall conform,
so far as practicable, to the laws in force at the time of such proceedings.
If any penalty, forfeiture or punishment is mitigated by any provision of
the new law, such provision may, by the consent of the party affected, be
applied to any judgment pronounced after the new law takes effect.

History.

465.

446.120.
References
to sections, subsections, and paragraphs — Citation of Acts of General
Assembly.

“KRS” may be used as an abbreviation of “Kentucky Revised Statutes.”

Wherever in the statute laws of this state a reference is made to several sections and the section numbers given in the reference are connected by the word “to,” the reference includes both the sections whose numbers are given and all intervening sections.

Wherever in the Kentucky Revised Statutes a reference is made to a subsection without stating the section of which the subsection referred to is a part, the reference is to the subsection of the section in which the reference is made.

Wherever in the Kentucky Revised Statutes a reference is made to a paragraph without stating the section and subsection of which the paragraph referred to is a part, the reference is to the paragraph of the subsection in which the reference is made.

Material in the official edition of the Acts of the General Assembly shall be cited in the following manner:

For acts of regular sessions, 19xx Ky. Acts ch. xxx, sec. xxx, e.g., 1990 Ky. Acts ch. 476, sec. 1; and

For acts of extraordinary sessions, 19xx (xxx Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. xxx, sec. xxx, e.g., 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 101.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 208, § 1, effective October 1, 1942; 1992, ch. 431, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.